Montana, session 2025, LC2428.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 13-37-225, MCA, is amended to read:
"13-37-225. Reports of contributions and expenditures required -- electronic filing and
publication. (1) (a) Except as provided in 13-37-206, 13-37-232, and subsections (1)(b) and (1)(c), each
candidate, political committee, and joint fundraising committee shall file with the commissioner periodic
electronic reports of contributions and expenditures made by or on the behalf of a candidate, political
committee, or joint fundraising committee.
(b) The commissioner may, for good cause shown in a written application by a candidate, political
committee, or joint fundraising committee grant a waiver to the requirement that reports be filed electronically.
(c) (i) If a candidate or treasurer for a political committee or a joint fundraising committee
experiences technical difficulties with the electronic report filing system, the candidate or treasurer may file by
fax or e-mail the same information in hard copy with the commissioner that would otherwise be required by
subsection (1)(a) to be filed electronically. Within 3 days of filing the required information in hard copy, the
candidate or treasurer shall file the information electronically.
(ii) A filing made pursuant to subsection (1)(c)(i) must be considered the same as an electronic
submission. The commissioner may not include a candidate in the notification to the secretary of state required
by 13-37-126(5) if the candidate meets the requirements of subsection (1)(c)(i).
(d) To facilitate the implementation of subsection (1)(c), the commissioner shall provide an
interactive document that can be filled out by the candidate or treasurer and printed, e-mailed, or faxed.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC2428.1
(2) The commissioner shall post on the commissioner's website:
(a) all reports filed under 13-37-226 within 7 business days of filing; and
(b) for each election, the calendar dates that correspond with the filing requirements of 13-37-226.
(3) In lieu of all contribution and expenditure reports required by this chapter, the commissioner
shall accept copies of the reports filed by candidates for congress and president of the United States and their
political committees pursuant to the requirements of federal law.
(4) A person who makes an election communication, electioneering communication, or
independent expenditure is subject to reporting and disclosure requirements as provided in chapters 35 and 37
of this title."

Section 2. Section 13-37-226, MCA, is amended to read:
"13-37-226. Time for filing reports. (1) Except as provided in 13-37-206 and 13-37-225(3), a
candidate shall file reports required by 13-37-225(1)(a) containing the information required by 13-37-229, 13-
37-231, and 13-37-232 as follows:
(a) quarterly, due on the 5th day following a calendar quarter, beginning with the calendar quarter
in which funds are received or expended during the year or years prior to the election year that the candidate
expects to be on the ballot and ending in the final quarter of the year preceding the year of an election in which
the candidate participates;
(b) except as provided in subsection (4)(a), the 20th day of March, April, May, June, August,
September, October, and November in the year of an election in which the candidate participates;
(c) except as provided in subsection (6), within 2 business days of receiving a contribution equal to
the applicable limitation provided in 13-37-216 for the candidate if the contribution is received between the 15th
day of the month preceding an election in which the candidate participates and the day before the election;
(d) except as provided in subsection (6), within 2 business days of making an expenditure of an
amount equal to or more than the applicable contribution limitation provided in 13-37-216 for the candidate if
made between the 15th day of the month preceding an election in which the candidate participates and the day
before the election;
(e) semiannually on the 10th day of March and September, starting in the year following an
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC2428.1
election in which the candidate participates until the candidate files a closing report as specified in 13-37-
228(3); and
(f) as provided by subsection (3).
(2) Except as provided in 13-37-206, 13-37-225(3), and 13-37-227, a political committee or a joint
fundraising committee shall file reports required by 13-37-225(1)(a) containing the information required by 13-
37-229, 13-37-231, and 13-37-232 as follows:
(a) quarterly, due on the 5th day following a calendar quarter, beginning with the calendar quarter
in which the political committee or the joint fundraising committee receives a contribution or makes an
expenditure after an individual becomes a candidate or an issue becomes a ballot issue, as defined in 13-1-
101(6)(b), and ending in the final quarter of the year preceding the year in which the candidate or the ballot
issue appears on the ballot;
(b) except as provided in subsection (4)(b), the 30th day of March, April, May, June, August,
September, October, and November in the year of an election in which the political committee or the joint
fundraising committee participates;
(c) within 2 business days of receiving a contribution, except as provided in 13-37-232, of $500 or
more if received between the 25th day of the month before an election in which the political committee or the
joint fundraising committee participates and the day before the election;
(d) within 2 business days of making an expenditure of $500 or more that is made between the
25th day of the month before an election in which the political committee or the joint fundraising committee
participates and the day before the election;
(e) quarterly, due on the 5th day following a calendar quarter, beginning in the calendar quarter
following a year of an election in which the political committee or the joint fundraising committee participates
until the political committee or the joint fundraising committee files a closing report as specified in 13-37-228(3);
and
(f) as provided by subsection (3).
(3) In addition to the reports required by subsections (1), (2), and (4), if a candidate, political
committee, or joint fundraising committee participates in a special election, the candidate, political committee,
or joint fundraising committee shall file reports as follows:
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC2428.1
(a) a report on the 60th, 35th, and 12th days preceding the date of the special election; and
(b) 20 days after the special election.
(4) (a) A candidate for a municipal office who participates in an election held in an odd-numbered
year shall file the reports required in subsection (1) on the 20th day of June, July, August, September, October,
and November of the year of the election in which the candidate participates.
(b) A political committee that participates in a municipal election held in an odd-numbered year
shall file the reports required in subsection (2) on the 30th day of June, July, August, September, October, and
November of the year of the election in which the committee participates.
(5) Except as provided by 13-37-206, candidates for a local office and political committees that
receive contributions or make expenditures referencing a particular local issue or a local candidate shall file the
reports specified in subsections (1) through (4) only if the total amount of contributions received or the total
amount of funds expended for all elections in a campaign exceeds $500.
(6) A candidate is not required to file a report required by subsection (1)(c) or (1)(d) if the
candidate is not opposed in the election.
(7) A report required by this section must cover contributions received and expenditures made
pursuant to the time periods specified in 13-37-228.
(8) A report required by this section is due by 11:59 p.m. on the due date.
(9) A political committee may file a closing report prior to the date in 13-37-228(3) and after the
complete termination of its contribution and expenditure activity during an election cycle.
(10) For the purposes of this section:
(a) a candidate participates in an election by attempting to secure nomination or election to an
office that appears on the ballot; and
(b) a political committee or a joint fundraising committee participates in an election by receiving a
contribution or making an expenditure.
(11) Nothing in this section may be construed to require an incidental committee to file a report
concerning expenditures made to political committees or joint fundraising committees or concerning any
contributions."

- 4 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC2428.1
Section 3. Section 13-37-229, MCA, is amended to read:
"13-37-229. Disclosure requirements for candidates, ballot issue committees, political party
committees, and independent committees -- exceptions. (1) The reports required under 13-37-225 through
13-37-227 from candidates, ballot issue committees, political party committees, independent committees, and
joint fundraising committees must disclose the following information concerning contributions received:
(a) the amount of cash on hand at the beginning of the reporting period;
(b) the full name, mailing address, occupation, and employer, if any, of each person who has
made aggregate contributions, other than loans, of $50 or more to a candidate, political committee, or joint
fundraising committee, including the purchase of tickets and other items for events, such as dinners, luncheons,
rallies, and similar fundraising events. If a contribution is made by a joint fundraising committee to a participant
in the joint fundraising committee, the participant shall disclose the information in this subsection (1)(b) for each
contributor of the funds allocated to the participant by the joint fundraising committee.
(c) for each person identified under subsection (1)(b), the aggregate amount of contributions made
by that person within the reporting period and the total amount of contributions made by that person for all
reporting periods;
(d) the total sum of individual contributions made to or for a political committee, candidate, or joint
fundraising committee and not reported under subsections (1)(b) and (1)(c);
(e) the name and address of each political committee, candidate, or joint fundraising committee
from which the reporting committee or candidate received any transfer of funds, together with the amount and
dates of all transfers;
(f) each loan from any person during the reporting period, together with the full names, mailing
addresses, occupations, and employers, if any, of the lender and endorsers, if any, and the date and amount of
each loan;
(g) except as provided in subsection (5), the amount and nature of debts and obligations owed to a
political committee, candidate, or joint fundraising committee in the form prescribed by the commissioner;
(h) an itemized account of proceeds that total less than $50 from a person from mass collections
made at fundraising events;
(i) each contribution, rebate, refund, or other receipt not otherwise listed under subsections (1)(b)
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC2428.1
through (1)(h) during the reporting period; and
(j) the total sum of all receipts received by or for the committee or candidate during the reporting
period.
(2) (a) Except as provided in subsection (2)(c), the reports required under 13-37-225 through 13-
37-227 from candidates, ballot issue committees, political party committees, independent committees, and joint
fundraising committees must disclose the following information concerning expenditures made:
(i) the full name, mailing address, occupation, and principal place of business, if any, of each
person to whom expenditures have been made by the committee or candidate during the reporting period,
including the amount, date, and purpose of each expenditure and the total amount of expenditures made to
each person;
(ii) the full name, mailing address, occupation, and principal place of business, if any, of each
person to whom an expenditure for personal services, salaries, and reimbursed expenses has been made,
including the amount, date, and purpose of that expenditure and the total amount of expenditures made to each
person;
(iii) the total sum of expenditures made by a political committee, candidate, or joint fundraising
committee during the reporting period. If the expenditure is made by a joint fundraising committee, the joint
fundraising committee shall report gross and net allocations to each participant.
(iv) the name and address of each political committee, candidate, or joint fundraising committee to
which the reporting committee or candidate made any transfer of funds, together with the amount and dates of
all transfers;
(v) the name of any person to whom a loan was made during the reporting period, including the full
name, mailing address, occupation, and principal place of business, if any, of that person and the full names,
mailing addresses, occupations, and principal places of business, if any, of the endorsers, if any, and the date
and amount of each loan;
(vi) except as provided in subsection (5), the amount and nature of debts and obligations owed by
a political committee, candidate, or joint fundraising committee in the form prescribed by the commissioner; and
(vii) if a joint fundraising committee allocated contributions to a participant, the contribution
information under subsections (1)(a) through (1)(c) for each contributor that contributed to the gross amount
- 6 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC2428.1
allocated by the joint fundraising committee to the participant.
(b) Reports of expenditures made to a consultant, advertising agency, polling firm, or other person
that performs services for or on behalf of a candidate, political committee, or joint fundraising committee must
be itemized and described in sufficient detail to disclose the specific services performed by the entity to which
payment or reimbursement was made.
(c) A candidate is required to report the information specified in this subsection (2) only if the
transactions involved were undertaken for the purpose of supporting or opposing a candidate.
(d) Subsection (2)(a)(vii) applies only to the report of a joint fundraising committee.
(3) (a) A Except as provided in 13-37-232, a candidate, a political committee, or a joint fundraising
committee is not required to report the following expenditures under the 2-business-day reporting requirements
in 13-37-226(1)(d) and (2)(d):
(i) bookkeeping expenses paid to track and ensure campaign finance compliance;
(ii) payroll expenditures;
(iii) mileage; and
(iv) payment on a previously disclosed debt.
(b) A candidate, a political committee, or a joint fundraising committee is not relieved of the duty to
report the expenditures listed in subsection (3)(a) in the next periodic report.
(4) A candidate is not required to report:
(a) contributions received from a political party committee for compensation of the personal
services of another person that are rendered to the candidate if the political party committee reports the amount
of contributions made to the candidate in the form of personal services; and
(b) tangible campaign materials such as campaign signage, literature, or photographs produced
for a previous campaign or video produced for a previous campaign if the expenditures to produce the tangible
materials or video were reported in a previous campaign by the candidate.
(5) A Except as provided in 13-37-232, a candidate, political committee, or joint fundraising
committee is not required to report a debt or obligation unless the debt or obligation exists and has not been
paid as of the day the report must be filed."

- 7 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC2428.1
Section 4. Section 13-37-232, MCA, is amended to read:
"13-37-232. Disclosure requirements for incidental committees. (1) A combination of two or more
individuals or a person other than an individual that would otherwise qualify as an incidental committee but that
receives less than $250 in contributions or that makes less than $250 in expenditures does not form a political
committee and is not required to file as an incidental committee.
(2) The reports required under 13-37-225 through 13-37-227 from incidental committees must
disclose the following information concerning contributions to the committee that are designated by the
contributor for a specified candidate, ballot issue, or petition for nomination or that are made by the contributor
in response to an appeal by the incidental committee for contributions to support incidental committee election
activity, including in-kind expenditures, independent expenditures, election communications, or electioneering
communications:
(a) except as provided in subsection (5), the full name, mailing address, occupation, and employer,
if any, of each person who has made aggregate contributions during the reporting period for a specified
candidate, ballot issue, or petition for nomination of $35 or more;
(b) for each person identified under subsection (2)(a), the aggregate amount of contributions made
by that person for all reporting periods;
(c) except as provided in subsection (5), each loan received from any person during the reporting
period for a specified candidate, ballot issue, or petition for nomination, together with the full names, mailing
addresses, occupations, and employers, if any, of the lender and endorsers, if any, and the date and amount of
each loan;
(d) the amount and nature of debts and obligations owed to an incidental committee for a specified
candidate, ballot issue, or petition for nomination in the form prescribed by the commissioner;
(e) an account of proceeds that total less than $35 per person from mass collections made at
fundraising events sponsored by the incidental committee for a specified candidate, ballot issue, or petition for
nomination; and
(f) the total sum of all contributions received by or designated for the incidental committee for a
specified candidate, ballot issue, or petition for nomination during the reporting period.
(3) (2) The reports required under 13-37-225 through 13-37-227 from incidental committees must
- 8 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC2428.1
disclose the following information concerning expenditures made:
(a) the full name, mailing address, occupation, and principal place of business, if any, of each
person to whom expenditures have been made during the reporting period, including the amount, date, and
purpose of each expenditure and the total amount of expenditures made to each person;only be made for
expenditures made by an incidental committee directly to a candidate's campaign. The reports must disclose
the full name, mailing address, occupation, and principal place of business, if any, of each candidate to whom
expenditures have been made during the reporting period, including the amount, date, and purpose of each
expenditure and the total amount of expenditures made to each candidate. No reports are required for
expenditures made to political committees or joint fundraising committees.
(b) the full name, mailing address, occupation, and principal place of business, if any, of each
person to whom an expenditure for personal services, salaries, and reimbursed expenses has been made
during the reporting period, including the amount, date, and purpose of that expenditure and the total amount of
expenditures made to each person;
(c) the total sum of expenditures made during the reporting period;
(d) the name and address of each political committee or candidate to which the reporting
committee made any transfer of funds together with the amount and dates of all transfers;
(e) the name of any person to whom a loan was made during the reporting period, including the full
name, mailing address, occupation, and principal place of business, if any, of that person, and the full names,
mailing addresses, occupations, and principal places of business, if any, of the endorsers, if any, and the date
and amount of each loan;
(f) the amount and nature of debts and obligations owed by a political committee in the form
prescribed by the commissioner; and
(g) other information that may be required by the commissioner to fully disclose the disposition of
funds used to make expenditures.
(4) Reports of expenditures made to a consultant, advertising agency, polling firm, or other person
that performs services for or on behalf of an incidental committee must be itemized and described in sufficient
detail to disclose the specific services performed by the entity to which payment or reimbursement was made.
(5)(3) An incidental committee shall report an expenditure within 30 days of making the expenditure
- 9 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC2428.1
unless the expenditure is made during the time period described in 13-37-226(2)(d).
(6) An incidental committee shall request the occupation and employer of a contributor or person
who provided a loan to the incidental committee. If the contributor or person who provided a loan does not
provide the requested information, the incidental committee is only required to report what is provided.
(7) An incidental committee that does not receive contributions for a specified candidate, ballot
issue, or petition for nomination and that does not solicit contributions for incidental committee election activity,
including in-kind expenditures, independent expenditures, election communications, or electioneering
communications, is required to report only its expenditures."
- END -
- 10 - Authorized Print Version – ****